Maine, session 132, LD381.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-A MRSA §9-316 is enacted to read:
§9-316. Portability of supervised loans secured by a mortgage
1. Mortgage porting; defined. For the purposes of this section, "mortgage porting"
means the process by which a mortgagor transfers the terms, outstanding balance and
interest rate of an existing supervised loan secured against a single-family dwelling or a
dwelling that consists of no more than 4 units that is the principal residence of the
mortgagor to another principal residence.
2. Eligibility for mortgage porting. A mortgagor is eligible for mortgage porting
from a supervised lender if:
A. The mortgagor has maintained the mortgagor's existing supervised loan in good
standing;
B. The mortgagor meets the supervised lender's appraisal and underwriting criteria;
and
C. The transfer is executed within 6 months from the sale of the previous principal
residence of the mortgagor.
3. Supervised lender requirements. The following provisions apply to supervised
lenders engaged in mortgage porting.
A. Upon approval of mortgage porting, the supervised lender shall transfer the terms,
outstanding balance and interest rate of the existing supervised loan.
B. Upon request of the mortgagor, a supervised lender may grant an extension of the
supervised loan repayment period.
C. Any additional funds required by the mortgagor to purchase the new principal
residence must be financed at current market rates, except that the supervised lender
shall provide an option for a blended interest rate.
D. A supervised lender may charge a one-time mortgage porting fee as long as the fee
is disclosed in advance to the mortgagor.
E. A supervised lender shall disclose the terms, conditions and fees for mortgage
porting in writing to the mortgagor.
4. Rulemaking. The administrator may adopt rules as necessary to implement the
requirements of this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.